Maryland, session 2026, HB1549.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Environment
6–801.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(u) (1) “Rental dwelling unit” means a room or group of rooms that form a
single [independent] habitable rental unit for permanent occupation by one or more
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1549*

HOUSE BILL 1549
individuals that has living facilities with, OR ACCESS TO, permanent provisions for living,
sleeping, eating, cooking, and sanitation.
(2) “Rental dwelling unit” does not include:
(i) An area not used for living, sleeping, eating, cooking, or
sanitation, such as an unfinished basement;
(ii) A unit within a hotel, motel, or similar seasonal or transient
facility;
(iii) An area which is secured and inaccessible to occupants; or
(iv) A unit which is not offered for rent.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.